Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-129
Replacement bond; issuance; notice.

Upon the issuance of any replacement bond or other evidence of indebtedness the issuer shall notify the paying agent with respect thereto and such paying agent shall not make payment of any portion of the principal or interest of any such mutilated, destroyed, stolen or lost bond or other evidence of indebtedness which has been replaced and shall promptly notify the issuer of such bond or other evidence of indebtedness if and when any such bond or other evidence of indebtedness so replaced is ever presented for payment.

Laws 1971, LB 873, § 3.